New York, session 2025-2026, A3223.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.32 to read as follows: 3 § 13.32 Fishing in state parks; veterans. Notwithstanding any other 4 provision of law to the contrary, the office shall allow any person who 5 meets the definition of veteran as defined in section one of the veter- 6 ans' services law; as one who served on active duty and has been 7 discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonor- 8 able, or has a qualifying condition as defined in section one of the 9 veterans' services law and has received a discharge other than bad 10 conduct or dishonorable, or is a discharged LGBT veteran as defined in 11 section one of the veterans' services law and has received a discharge 12 other than bad conduct or dishonorable to fish for free at all state 13 parks under the jurisdiction of the office or other state agency. The 14 office shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary 15 to carry out the provisions of this section. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 18 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 19 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 20 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06507-02-5